Illinois, session 104th, HB3121.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Governmental Ethics Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1-113, 2-104, and 3A-35 and by adding 6Sections 3-108 and 3-109 as follows: 7    (5 ILCS 420/1-113)  (from Ch. 127, par. 601-113)8    Sec. 1-113. "Representation case" means the professional 9representation of any person, client or principal, with or 10without compensation, in any matter before any State agency or 11unit of local government where the action or non-action of the 12State agency or unit of local government involves the exercise 13of substantial discretion. However, the term shall not include 14inquiries for information or other services rendered in a 15legislative capacity on behalf of a constituent or other 16member of the public.17(Source: Laws 1967, p. 3401.) 18    (5 ILCS 420/2-104)  (from Ch. 127, par. 602-104)19    Sec. 2-104. Representation case. No legislator may accept 20or participate in any way in any representation case, as that 21term is defined in Section 1-113, if the State or unit of local 22government is an adverse party or if the result is an adverse   HB3121- 2 -LRB104 10075 BDA 20147 b1effect on State or local revenue, State or local finances, or 2the health, safety, welfare, or relative tax burden of any 3State resident before (1) the Court of Claims of this State or 4(2) the Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission, when the 5State of Illinois is the respondent.6    This Section prohibits does not prohibit participation in 7such a representation case by a person with whom the 8legislator maintains a close economic association, unless the 9fact of that association is used to influence or attempt to 10influence the State agency in the rendering of its decision.11    A violation of this Section is a Class A misdemeanor.12(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 13    (5 ILCS 420/3-108 new)14    Sec. 3-108. Testimony against government interests. No 15legislator may derive any income, compensation, or other 16tangible benefit from providing opinion evidence as an expert 17against the interests of the State or a unit of local 18government in any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding before 19any administrative agency or court. 20    (5 ILCS 420/3-109 new)21    Sec. 3-109. Legislator recusal. Notwithstanding any 22provision of law to the contrary, a legislator shall 23officially recuse himself or herself from any legislative 24matter in which the legislator or his or her spouse or   HB3121- 3 -LRB104 10075 BDA 20147 b1immediate family member has a financial interest and shall 2include in the recusal a written explanation for the recusal. 3    (5 ILCS 420/3A-35)4    Sec. 3A-35. Conflicts of interests. 5    (a) In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of 6Section 50-13 of the Illinois Procurement Code, it is unlawful 7for an appointed member of a board, commission, authority, or 8task force authorized or created by State law or by executive 9order of the Governor, the spouse of the appointee, or an 10immediate family member of the appointee living in the 11appointee's residence to have or acquire a contract or have or 12acquire a direct pecuniary interest in a contract with the 13State that relates to the board, commission, authority, or 14task force of which he or she is an appointee during and for 15one year after the conclusion of the person's term of office.16    (b) If (i) a person subject to subsection (a) is entitled 17to receive more than 7 1/2% of the total distributable income 18of a partnership, association, corporation, or other business 19entity or (ii) a person subject to subsection (a) together 20with his or her spouse and immediate family members living in 21that person's residence are entitled to receive more than 15%, 22in the aggregate, of the total distributable income of a 23partnership, association, corporation, or other business 24entity then it is unlawful for that partnership, association, 25corporation, or other business entity to have or acquire a   HB3121- 4 -LRB104 10075 BDA 20147 b1contract or a direct pecuniary interest in a contract 2prohibited by subsection (a) during and for one year after the 3conclusion of the person's term of office. 4    (c) No employee of a governmental entity subject to the 5provisions of this Act may represent, or derive any income, 6compensation, or other tangible benefit from the 7representation of, any person in any judicial, quasi-judicial, 8or other proceeding before any administrative agency or court 9in which the State or unit of local government is an adverse 10party, or in any such proceeding that may result in an adverse 11effect on State or local revenue, State or local finances, or 12the health, safety, welfare, or relative tax burden of any 13State resident.14    (d) No employee of a governmental entity subject to the 15provisions of this Act may derive any income, compensation, or 16other tangible benefit from providing opinion evidence as an 17expert against the interests of the State or a unit of local 18government in any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding before 19any administrative agency or court. 20(Source: P.A. 93-615, eff. 11-19-03.) 21    (5 ILCS 420/3-202 rep.)22    (5 ILCS 420/3-203 rep.)23    Section 10. The Illinois Governmental Ethics Act is 24amended by repealing Sections 3-202 and 3-203.